Nebraska, session 109, LB1131.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 4 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Domestic Violence and Human Trafficking Service Providers
Tax Credit Act.
Sec. 2. (1) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2027, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, there shall be allowed refundable credits against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as follows:
(a) Four hundred eighty thousand dollars of tax credits to be
distributed equally among qualifying domestic violence and sexual assault
programs run by tribal governments;
(b) Three hundred thousand dollars of tax credits to be distributed
to a statewide coalition representing nonprofit organizations that have
an affiliation agreement with the Department of Health and Human Services
to provide services to victims of domestic abuse under the Protection
from Domestic Abuse Act; and
(c) Five million two hundred twenty thousand dollars of tax credits
to be distributed as follows:
(i) Two million eighty-eight thousand dollars of tax credits to be
distributed equally to entities described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of
this subsection;
(ii) Two million five hundred five thousand six hundred dollars of
tax credits to be distributed based on the population of the program or
agency service area as shown by the latest federal decennial census or as
determined by the department if such census data is not available; and
(iii) Six hundred twenty-six thousand four hundred dollars of tax
credits to be distributed based on the square miles of the program or
agency service area.
(2) The department shall distribute all of the credits allowed under
the Domestic Violence and Human Trafficking Service Providers Tax Credit
Act every taxable year.
(3) For purposes of this section:
-2-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
(a) Department means the Department of Revenue;
(b) Nonprofit organization means an organization organized under
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(c) Tribal has the same meaning as in section 71-914.02.
Sec. 3. A credit recipient may sell all or a portion of the tax
credit received under section 2 of this act to another taxpayer. The
purchasing taxpayer must have received a transfer of the tax credit prior
to the date a tax return, or amended return, claiming the tax credit is
filed. For any tax year in which a credit is sold pursuant to this
section, the credit recipient selling the tax credit shall notify the
department of the sale and provide the tax identification number of the
taxpayer purchasing the tax credit at least thirty days prior to the
taxpayer claiming the tax credit. The notification shall be in the manner
prescribed by the department.
Sec. 4. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Domestic Violence and Human Trafficking
Service Providers Tax Credit Act.
Sec. 5. Section 77-202, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-202 (1) The following property shall be exempt from property
taxes:
(a) Property of the state and its governmental subdivisions to the
extent used or being developed for use by the state or governmental
subdivision for a public purpose. For purposes of this subdivision:
(i) Property of the state and its governmental subdivisions means
(A) property held in fee title by the state or a governmental subdivision
or (B) property beneficially owned by the state or a governmental
subdivision in that it is used for a public purpose and is being acquired
under a lease-purchase agreement, financing lease, or other instrument
which provides for transfer of legal title to the property to the state
or a governmental subdivision upon payment of all amounts due thereunder.
-3-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
If the property to be beneficially owned by a governmental subdivision
has a total acquisition cost that exceeds the threshold amount or will be
used as the site of a public building with a total estimated construction
cost that exceeds the threshold amount, then such property shall qualify
for an exemption under this section only if the question of acquiring
such property or constructing such public building has been submitted at
a primary, general, or special election held within the governmental
subdivision and has been approved by the voters of the governmental
subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, threshold amount means the
greater of fifty thousand dollars or six-tenths of one percent of the
total actual value of real and personal property of the governmental
subdivision that will beneficially own the property as of the end of the
governmental subdivision's prior fiscal year; and
(ii) Public purpose means use of the property (A) to provide public
services with or without cost to the recipient, including the general
operation of government, public education, public safety, transportation,
public works, civil and criminal justice, public health and welfare,
developments by a public housing authority, parks, culture, recreation,
community development, and cemetery purposes, or (B) to carry out the
duties and responsibilities conferred by law with or without
consideration. Public purpose does not include leasing of property to a
private party unless the lease of the property is at fair market value
for a public purpose. Leases of property by a public housing authority to
low-income individuals as a place of residence are for the authority's
public purpose;
(b) Unleased property of the state or its governmental subdivisions
which is not being used or developed for use for a public purpose but
upon which a payment in lieu of taxes is paid for public safety, rescue,
and emergency services and road or street construction or maintenance
services to all governmental units providing such services to the
property. Except as provided in Article VIII, section 11, of the
-4-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
Constitution of Nebraska, the payment in lieu of taxes shall be based on
the proportionate share of the cost of providing public safety, rescue,
or emergency services and road or street construction or maintenance
services unless a general policy is adopted by the governing body of the
governmental subdivision providing such services which provides for a
different method of determining the amount of the payment in lieu of
taxes. The governing body may adopt a general policy by ordinance or
resolution for determining the amount of payment in lieu of taxes by
majority vote after a hearing on the ordinance or resolution. Such
ordinance or resolution shall nevertheless result in an equitable
contribution for the cost of providing such services to the exempt
property;
(c) Property owned by and used exclusively for agricultural and
horticultural societies;
(d)(i) Property owned by educational, religious, charitable, or
cemetery organizations, or any organization for the exclusive benefit of
any such educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery organization,
and used exclusively for educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery
purposes, when such property is not (A) owned or used for financial gain
or profit to either the owner or user, (B) used for the sale of alcoholic
liquors for more than twenty hours per week, or (C) owned or used by an
organization which discriminates in membership or employment based on
race, color, or national origin.
(ii) For purposes of subdivision (1)(d) of this section:
(A) Educational organization means (I) an institution operated
exclusively for the purpose of offering regular courses with systematic
instruction in academic, vocational, or technical subjects or assisting
students through services relating to the origination, processing, or
guarantying of federally reinsured student loans for higher education,
(II) a museum or historical society operated exclusively for the benefit
and education of the public, or (III) a nonprofit organization that owns
-5-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
or operates a child care facility; and
(B) Charitable organization includes (I) an organization operated
exclusively for the purpose of the mental, social, or physical benefit of
the public or an indefinite number of persons and (II) a fraternal
benefit society organized and licensed under sections 44-1072 to
44-10,109.
(iii) The property tax exemption authorized in subdivision (1)(d)(i)
of this section shall apply to any for-profit skilled nursing facility,
for-profit nursing facility, or for-profit assisted-living facility that
provides housing for medicaid beneficiaries, except that the exemption
amount for such property shall be a percentage of the property taxes that
would otherwise be due. Such percentage shall be equal to the average
percentage of occupied beds in the facility provided to medicaid
beneficiaries over the most recent three-year period. This subdivision
shall not be construed to modify, limit, or reduce any property tax
exemption provided to a nonprofit skilled nursing facility, nonprofit
nursing facility, or nonprofit assisted-living facility pursuant to
subdivision (1)(d)(i) of this section. For purposes of this subdivision,
skilled nursing facility has the same meaning as in section 71-429,
nursing facility has the same meaning as in section 71-424, and assisted-
living facility has the same meaning as in section 71-5903.
(iv) The property tax exemption authorized in subdivision (1)(d)(i)
of this section shall apply to a building that (A) is owned by a
charitable organization, (B) is made available to students in attendance
at an educational institution, and (C) is recognized by such educational
institution as approved student housing, except that the exemption shall
only apply to the commons area of such building, including any common
rooms and cooking and eating facilities;
(e) Household goods and personal effects not owned or used for
financial gain or profit to either the owner or user; and
(f) A portion of the property owned by a taxpayer as provided in the
-6-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
Recreational Trail Easement Property Tax Exemption Act.
(2) The increased value of land by reason of shade and ornamental
trees planted along the highway shall not be taken into account in the
valuation of land.
(3) Tangible personal property which is not depreciable tangible
personal property as defined in section 77-119 shall be exempt from
property tax.
(4) Motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers required to be
registered for operation on the highways of this state shall be exempt
from payment of property taxes.
(5) Business and agricultural inventory shall be exempt from the
personal property tax. For purposes of this subsection, business
inventory includes personal property owned for purposes of leasing or
renting such property to others for financial gain only if the personal
property is of a type which in the ordinary course of business is leased
or rented thirty days or less and may be returned at the option of the
lessee or renter at any time and the personal property is of a type which
would be considered household goods or personal effects if owned by an
individual. All other personal property owned for purposes of leasing or
renting such property to others for financial gain shall not be
considered business inventory.
(6) Any personal property exempt pursuant to subsection (2) of
section 77-4105 or section 77-5209.02 shall be exempt from the personal
property tax.
(7) Livestock shall be exempt from the personal property tax.
(8) Any personal property exempt pursuant to the Nebraska Advantage
Act or the ImagiNE Nebraska Act shall be exempt from the personal
property tax.
(9) Any depreciable tangible personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind as the fuel source shall be exempt
from the property tax levied on depreciable tangible personal property.
-7-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
Any depreciable tangible personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the
fuel source shall be exempt from the property tax levied on depreciable
tangible personal property if such depreciable tangible personal property
was installed on or after January 1, 2016, and has a nameplate capacity
of one hundred kilowatts or more. Depreciable tangible personal property
used directly in the generation of electricity using wind, solar,
biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel source includes, but is not limited
to, wind turbines, rotors and blades, towers, solar panels, trackers,
generating equipment, transmission components, substations, supporting
structures or racks, inverters, and other system components such as
wiring, control systems, switchgears, and generator step-up transformers.
(10) Any tangible personal property that is acquired by a person
operating a data center located in this state, that is assembled,
engineered, processed, fabricated, manufactured into, attached to, or
incorporated into other tangible personal property, both in component
form or that of an assembled product, for the purpose of subsequent use
at a physical location outside this state by the person operating a data
center shall be exempt from the personal property tax. Such exemption
extends to keeping, retaining, or exercising any right or power over
tangible personal property in this state for the purpose of subsequently
transporting it outside this state for use thereafter outside this state.
For purposes of this subsection, data center means computers, supporting
equipment, and other organized assembly of hardware or software that are
designed to centralize the storage, management, or dissemination of data
and information, environmentally controlled structures or facilities or
interrelated structures or facilities that provide the infrastructure for
housing the equipment, such as raised flooring, electricity supply,
communication and data lines, Internet access, cooling, security, and
fire suppression, and any building housing the foregoing.
(10) (11) For tax years prior to tax year 2020, each person who owns
-8-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
property required to be reported to the county assessor under section
77-1201 shall be allowed an exemption amount as provided in the Personal
Property Tax Relief Act. For tax years prior to tax year 2020, each
person who owns property required to be valued by the state as provided
in section 77-601, 77-682, 77-801, or 77-1248 shall be allowed a
compensating exemption factor as provided in the Personal Property Tax
Relief Act.
(11)(a) (12)(a) Broadband equipment shall be exempt from the
personal property tax if such broadband equipment is:
(i) Deployed in an area funded in whole or in part by funds from the
Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program, authorized by the
federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Public Law 117-58; or
(ii) Deployed in a qualified census tract located within the
corporate limits of a city of the metropolitan class and being utilized
to provide end-users with access to the Internet at speeds of at least
one hundred megabits per second for downloading and at least one hundred
megabits per second for uploading.
(b) An owner of broadband equipment seeking an exemption under this
section shall apply for an exemption to the county assessor on or before
December 31 of the year preceding the year for which the exemption is to
begin. If the broadband equipment meets the criteria described in this
subsection, the county assessor shall approve the application within
thirty calendar days after receiving the application. The application
shall be on forms prescribed by the Tax Commissioner.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Broadband communications service means telecommunications
service as defined in section 86-121, video programming as defined in 47
U.S.C. 522, as such section existed on January 1, 2024, or Internet
access as defined in section 1104 of the federal Internet Tax Freedom
Act, Public Law 105-277;
(ii) Broadband equipment means machinery or equipment used to
-9-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
provide broadband communications service and includes, but is not limited
to, wires, cables, fiber, conduits, antennas, poles, switches, routers,
amplifiers, rectifiers, repeaters, receivers, multiplexers, duplexers,
transmitters, circuit cards, insulating and protective materials and
cases, power equipment, backup power equipment, diagnostic equipment,
storage devices, modems, and other general central office or headend
equipment, such as channel cards, frames, and cabinets, or equipment used
in successor technologies, including items used to monitor, test,
maintain, enable, or facilitate qualifying equipment, machinery,
software, ancillary components, appurtenances, accessories, or other
infrastructure that is used in whole or in part to provide broadband
communications service. Machinery or equipment used to produce broadband
communications service does not include personal consumer electronics,
including, but not limited to, smartphones, computers, and tablets; and
(iii) Qualified census tract means a qualified census tract as
defined in 26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on
January 1, 2024.
Sec. 6. Section 77-2715.07, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-2715.07 (1) There shall be allowed to qualified resident
individuals as a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) A credit equal to the federal credit allowed under section 22 of
the Internal Revenue Code; and
(b) A credit for taxes paid to another state as provided in section
77-2730.
(2) There shall be allowed to qualified resident individuals against
the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) For returns filed reporting federal adjusted gross incomes of
greater than twenty-nine thousand dollars, a nonrefundable credit equal
to twenty-five percent of the federal credit allowed under section 21 of
-10-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, except that for taxable
years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2015, such
nonrefundable credit shall be allowed only if the individual would have
received the federal credit allowed under section 21 of the code after
adding back in any carryforward of a net operating loss that was deducted
pursuant to such section in determining eligibility for the federal
credit;
(b) For returns filed reporting federal adjusted gross income of
twenty-nine thousand dollars or less, a refundable credit equal to a
percentage of the federal credit allowable under section 21 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, whether or not the federal
credit was limited by the federal tax liability. The percentage of the
federal credit shall be one hundred percent for incomes not greater than
twenty-two thousand dollars, and the percentage shall be reduced by ten
percent for each one thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the
reported federal adjusted gross income exceeds twenty-two thousand
dollars, except that for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2015, such refundable credit shall be allowed only if
the individual would have received the federal credit allowed under
section 21 of the code after adding back in any carryforward of a net
operating loss that was deducted pursuant to such section in determining
eligibility for the federal credit;
(c) A refundable credit as provided in section 77-5209.01 for
individuals who qualify for an income tax credit as a qualified beginning
farmer or livestock producer under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act
for all taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2006, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(d) A refundable credit for individuals who qualify for an income
tax credit under the Adoption Tax Credit Act, the Angel Investment Tax
Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the
Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act, the Reverse Osmosis
-11-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
System Tax Credit Act, or the Volunteer Emergency Responders Incentive
Act;
(e) A refundable credit equal to ten percent of the federal credit
allowed under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, except that for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2015, such refundable credit shall be allowed only if
the individual would have received the federal credit allowed under
section 32 of the code after adding back in any carryforward of a net
operating loss that was deducted pursuant to such section in determining
eligibility for the federal credit; and
(f) A refundable credit as provided in section 77-7203 for
individuals who qualify for an income tax credit under the Child Care Tax
Credit Act for all taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(3) There shall be allowed to all individuals as a nonrefundable
credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of
1967:
(a) A credit for personal exemptions allowed under section
77-2716.01;
(b) A credit for (i) contributions to programs or projects certified
for tax credit status as provided in the Creating High Impact Economic
Futures Act and (ii) contributions to certified community betterment
programs as provided in the Community Development Assistance Act. Each
partner, each shareholder of an electing subchapter S corporation, each
beneficiary of an estate or trust, or each member of a limited liability
company shall report his or her share of the credit in the same manner
and proportion as he or she reports the partnership, subchapter S
corporation, estate, trust, or limited liability company income;
(c) A credit for investment in a biodiesel facility as provided in
section 77-27,236;
(d) A credit as provided in the New Markets Job Growth Investment
-12-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
Act;
(e) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Act;
(f) A credit to employers as provided in sections 77-27,238 and
77-27,240;
(g) A credit as provided in the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act;
(h) A credit to grocery store retailers, restaurants, and
agricultural producers as provided in section 77-27,241;
(i) A credit as provided in the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit
Act;
(j) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Shortline Rail
Modernization Act;
(k) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act; and
(l) A credit as provided in the Caregiver Tax Credit Act.
(4) There shall be allowed as a credit against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) A credit to all resident estates and trusts for taxes paid to
another state as provided in section 77-2730;
(b) A credit to all estates and trusts for (i) contributions to
programs or projects certified for tax credit status as provided in the
Creating High Impact Economic Futures Act and (ii) contributions to
certified community betterment programs as provided in the Community
Development Assistance Act; and
(c) A refundable credit for individuals who qualify for an income
tax credit as an owner of agricultural assets under the Beginning Farmer
Tax Credit Act for all taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2009, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended. The credit allowed for each partner, shareholder, member, or
beneficiary of a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or
estate or trust qualifying for an income tax credit as an owner of
agricultural assets under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act shall be
-13-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
equal to the partner's, shareholder's, member's, or beneficiary's portion
of the amount of tax credit distributed pursuant to subsection (6) of
section 77-5211.
(5)(a) For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2007,
and before January 1, 2009, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, there shall be allowed to each partner, shareholder, member, or
beneficiary of a partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability
company, or estate or trust a nonrefundable credit against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 equal to fifty percent of the
partner's, shareholder's, member's, or beneficiary's portion of the
amount of franchise tax paid to the state under sections 77-3801 to
77-3807 by a financial institution.
(b) For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2009,
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, there shall be
allowed to each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary of a
partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability company, or
estate or trust a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 equal to the partner's, shareholder's,
member's, or beneficiary's portion of the amount of franchise tax paid to
the state under sections 77-3801 to 77-3807 by a financial institution.
(c) Each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary shall report
his or her share of the credit in the same manner and proportion as he or
she reports the partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability
company, or estate or trust income. If any partner, shareholder, member,
or beneficiary cannot fully utilize the credit for that year, the credit
may not be carried forward or back.
(6) There shall be allowed to all individuals nonrefundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
provided in section 77-3604 and refundable credits against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in section
77-3605.
-14-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
(7)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2032, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, a nonrefundable credit against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 in the amount of five
thousand dollars shall be allowed to any individual who purchases a
residence during the taxable year if such residence:
(i) Is located within an area that has been declared an extremely
blighted area under section 18-2101.02;
(ii) Is the individual's primary residence; and
(iii) Was not purchased from a family member of the individual or a
family member of the individual's spouse.
(b) The credit provided in this subsection shall be claimed for the
taxable year in which the residence is purchased. If the individual
cannot fully utilize the credit for such year, the credit may be carried
forward to subsequent taxable years until fully utilized.
(c) No more than one credit may be claimed under this subsection
with respect to a single residence.
(d) The credit provided in this subsection shall be subject to
recapture by the Department of Revenue if the individual claiming the
credit sells or otherwise transfers the residence or quits using the
residence as his or her primary residence within five years after the end
of the taxable year in which the credit was claimed.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, family member means an
individual's spouse, child, parent, brother, sister, grandchild, or
grandparent, whether by blood, marriage, or adoption.
(8) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
provided in the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Domestic Violence and
Human Trafficking Service Providers Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the
Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act, the Relocation Incentive Act, and
-15-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
the Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit Act.
(9)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a
refundable credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 shall be allowed to the parent of a stillborn child if:
(i) A fetal death certificate is filed pursuant to subsection (1) of
section 71-606 for such child;
(ii) Such child had advanced to at least the twentieth week of
gestation; and
(iii) Such child would have been a dependent of the individual
claiming the credit.
(b) The amount of the credit shall be two thousand dollars.
(c) The credit shall be allowed for the taxable year in which the
stillbirth occurred.
(10) There shall be allowed to all individuals nonrefundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
provided in section 77-7204.
(11) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
provided in section 77-3157 and nonrefundable credits against the income
tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in sections
77-3156, 77-3158, and 77-3159.
Sec. 7. Section 77-2717, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2717 (1)(a)(i) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin
before January 1, 2014, the tax imposed on all resident estates and
trusts shall be a percentage of the federal taxable income of such
estates and trusts as modified in section 77-2716, plus a percentage of
the federal alternative minimum tax and the federal tax on premature or
lump-sum distributions from qualified retirement plans. The additional
taxes shall be recomputed by (A) substituting Nebraska taxable income for
-16-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
federal taxable income, (B) calculating what the federal alternative
minimum tax would be on Nebraska taxable income and adjusting such
calculations for any items which are reflected differently in the
determination of federal taxable income, and (C) applying Nebraska rates
to the result. The federal credit for prior year minimum tax, after the
recomputations required by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, and the
credits provided in the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act
and the Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act shall be allowed
as a reduction in the income tax due. A refundable income tax credit
shall be allowed for all resident estates and trusts under the Angel
Investment Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax
Credit Act, and the Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act. A
nonrefundable income tax credit shall be allowed for all resident estates
and trusts as provided in the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act.
(ii) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2014, the tax imposed on all resident estates and trusts shall
be a percentage of the federal taxable income of such estates and trusts
as modified in section 77-2716, plus a percentage of the federal tax on
premature or lump-sum distributions from qualified retirement plans. The
additional taxes shall be recomputed by substituting Nebraska taxable
income for federal taxable income and applying Nebraska rates to the
result. The credits provided in the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise
Tax Credit Act and the Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act
shall be allowed as a reduction in the income tax due. A refundable
income tax credit shall be allowed for all resident estates and trusts
under the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act, the Cast and Crew Nebraska
Act, the Domestic Violence and Human Trafficking Service Providers Tax
Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the
Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel
Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Property Tax Incentive Act, the Relocation Incentive Act, and the
-17-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit Act. A nonrefundable income tax
credit shall be allowed for all resident estates and trusts as provided
in the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act, the New
Markets Job Growth Investment Act, the School Readiness Tax Credit Act,
the Child Care Tax Credit Act, the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act, the
Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Shortline Rail
Modernization Act, the Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act, the Individuals with
Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities Support Act, and sections
77-27,238, 77-27,240, and 77-27,241.
(b) The tax imposed on all nonresident estates and trusts shall be
the portion of the tax imposed on resident estates and trusts which is
attributable to the income derived from sources within this state. The
tax which is attributable to income derived from sources within this
state shall be determined by multiplying the liability to this state for
a resident estate or trust with the same total income by a fraction, the
numerator of which is the nonresident estate's or trust's Nebraska income
as determined by sections 77-2724 and 77-2725 and the denominator of
which is its total federal income after first adjusting each by the
amounts provided in section 77-2716. The federal credit for prior year
minimum tax, after the recomputations required by the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967, reduced by the percentage of the total income which is
attributable to income from sources outside this state, and the credits
provided in the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act and the
Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act shall be allowed as a
reduction in the income tax due. A refundable income tax credit shall be
allowed for all nonresident estates and trusts under the Angel Investment
Tax Credit Act, the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Domestic Violence and
Human Trafficking Service Providers Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research
and Development Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act, the
-18-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
Relocation Incentive Act, and the Renewable Chemical Production Tax
Credit Act. A nonrefundable income tax credit shall be allowed for all
nonresident estates and trusts as provided in the Nebraska Job Creation
and Mainstreet Revitalization Act, the New Markets Job Growth Investment
Act, the School Readiness Tax Credit Act, the Child Care Tax Credit Act,
the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax
Credit Act, the Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act, the Nebraska
Pregnancy Help Act, the Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental
Disabilities Support Act, and sections 77-27,238, 77-27,240, and
77-27,241.
(2) In all instances wherein a fiduciary income tax return is
required under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, a Nebraska
fiduciary return shall be filed, except that a fiduciary return shall not
be required to be filed regarding a simple trust if all of the trust's
beneficiaries are residents of the State of Nebraska, all of the trust's
income is derived from sources in this state, and the trust has no
federal tax liability. The fiduciary shall be responsible for making the
return for the estate or trust for which he or she acts, whether the
income be taxable to the estate or trust or to the beneficiaries thereof.
The fiduciary shall include in the return a statement of each
beneficiary's distributive share of net income when such income is
taxable to such beneficiaries.
(3) The beneficiaries of such estate or trust who are residents of
this state shall include in their income their proportionate share of
such estate's or trust's federal income and shall reduce their Nebraska
tax liability by their proportionate share of the credits as provided in
the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage
Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research and
Development Act, the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization
Act, the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act, the School Readiness Tax
Credit Act, the Child Care Tax Credit Act, the Affordable Housing Tax
-19-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
Credit Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Higher
Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act, the
Relocation Incentive Act, the Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit
Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Shortline
Rail Modernization Act, the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Nebraska
Pregnancy Help Act, the Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental
Disabilities Support Act, the Domestic Violence and Human Trafficking
Service Providers Tax Credit Act, and sections 77-27,238, 77-27,240, and
77-27,241. There shall be allowed to a beneficiary a refundable income
tax credit under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act for all taxable
years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2001, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) If any beneficiary of such estate or trust is a nonresident
during any part of the estate's or trust's taxable year, he or she shall
file a Nebraska income tax return which shall include (a) in Nebraska
adjusted gross income that portion of the estate's or trust's Nebraska
income, as determined under sections 77-2724 and 77-2725, allocable to
his or her interest in the estate or trust and (b) a reduction of the
Nebraska tax liability by his or her proportionate share of the credits
as provided in the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research
and Development Act, the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Act, the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act, the School
Readiness Tax Credit Act, the Child Care Tax Credit Act, the Affordable
Housing Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the
Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive
Act, the Relocation Incentive Act, the Renewable Chemical Production Tax
Credit Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Shortline Rail Modernization Act, the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the
Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act, the Individuals with Intellectual and
Developmental Disabilities Support Act, the Domestic Violence and Human
-20-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
Trafficking Service Providers Tax Credit Act, and sections 77-27,238,
77-27,240, and 77-27,241 and shall execute and forward to the fiduciary,
on or before the original due date of the Nebraska fiduciary return, an
agreement which states that he or she will file a Nebraska income tax
return and pay income tax on all income derived from or connected with
sources in this state, and such agreement shall be attached to the
Nebraska fiduciary return for such taxable year.
(5) In the absence of the nonresident beneficiary's executed
agreement being attached to the Nebraska fiduciary return, the estate or
trust shall remit a portion of such beneficiary's income which was
derived from or attributable to Nebraska sources with its Nebraska return
for the taxable year. For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin
before January 1, 2013, the amount of remittance, in such instance, shall
be the highest individual income tax rate determined under section
77-2715.02 multiplied by the nonresident beneficiary's share of the
estate or trust income which was derived from or attributable to sources
within this state. For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2013, the amount of remittance, in such instance, shall
be the highest individual income tax rate determined under section
77-2715.03 multiplied by the nonresident beneficiary's share of the
estate or trust income which was derived from or attributable to sources
within this state. The amount remitted shall be allowed as a credit
against the Nebraska income tax liability of the beneficiary.
(6) The Tax Commissioner may allow a nonresident beneficiary to not
file a Nebraska income tax return if the nonresident beneficiary's only
source of Nebraska income was his or her share of the estate's or trust's
income which was derived from or attributable to sources within this
state, the nonresident did not file an agreement to file a Nebraska
income tax return, and the estate or trust has remitted the amount
required by subsection (5) of this section on behalf of such nonresident
beneficiary. The amount remitted shall be retained in satisfaction of the
-21-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
Nebraska income tax liability of the nonresident beneficiary.
(7) For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise
requires, simple trust shall mean any trust instrument which (a) requires
that all income shall be distributed currently to the beneficiaries, (b)
does not allow amounts to be paid, permanently set aside, or used in the
tax year for charitable purposes, and (c) does not distribute amounts
allocated in the corpus of the trust. Any trust which does not qualify as
a simple trust shall be deemed a complex trust.
(8) For purposes of this section, any beneficiary of an estate or
trust that is a grantor trust of a nonresident shall be disregarded and
this section shall apply as though the nonresident grantor was the
beneficiary.
Sec. 8. Section 77-2734.03, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-2734.03 (1)(a) For taxable years commencing prior to January 1,
1997, any (i) insurer paying a tax on premiums and assessments pursuant
to section 77-908 or 81-523, (ii) electric cooperative organized under
the Joint Public Power Authority Act, or (iii) credit union shall be
credited, in the computation of the tax due under the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967, with the amount paid during the taxable year as taxes on
such premiums and assessments and taxes in lieu of intangible tax.
(b) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 1997, any
insurer paying a tax on premiums and assessments pursuant to section
77-908 or 81-523, any electric cooperative organized under the Joint
Public Power Authority Act, or any credit union shall be credited, in the
computation of the tax due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, with
the amount paid during the taxable year as (i) taxes on such premiums and
assessments included as Nebraska premiums and assessments under section
77-2734.05 and (ii) taxes in lieu of intangible tax.
(c) For taxable years commencing or deemed to commence prior to, on,
or after January 1, 1998, any insurer paying a tax on premiums and
-22-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
assessments pursuant to section 77-908 or 81-523 shall be credited, in
the computation of the tax due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967,
with the amount paid during the taxable year as assessments allowed as an
offset against premium and related retaliatory tax liability pursuant to
section 44-4233.
(2) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a tax credit for
(a) contributions to programs or projects certified for tax credit status
as provided in the Creating High Impact Economic Futures Act and (b)
contributions to certified community betterment programs as provided in
the Community Development Assistance Act.
(3) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a refundable
income tax credit under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act for all
taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2001,
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) The changes made to this section by Laws 2004, LB 983, apply to
motor fuels purchased during any tax year ending or deemed to end on or
after January 1, 2005, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended.
(5) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers refundable income
tax credits under the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act,
the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Domestic Violence and Human
Trafficking Service Providers Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage
Research and Development Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the
Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive
Act, the Relocation Incentive Act, and the Renewable Chemical Production
Tax Credit Act.
(6) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a nonrefundable
income tax credit for investment in a biodiesel facility as provided in
section 77-27,236.
(7) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a nonrefundable
income tax credit as provided in the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
-23-

LB1131 LB1131
2026 2026
Revitalization Act, the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act, the School
Readiness Tax Credit Act, the Child Care Tax Credit Act, the Affordable
Housing Tax Credit Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act, the
Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act, the Nebraska Pregnancy Help
Act, the Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Support Act, and sections 77-27,238, 77-27,240, and 77-27,241.
Sec. 9. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 10. Original section 77-2717, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and sections 77-202, 77-2715.07, and 77-2734.03,
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 11. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
77-2701.54 and 77-2704.62, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-24-